Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 11
Arkansas Environmental Regulatory Flexibility Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-11-101. Title.

This chapter may be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Environmental Regulatory Flexibility Act”.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 500, § 1.

8-11-102. Purpose.

The improvement of the environment of the State of Arkansas is a matter of concern to all citizens of this state, and existing environmental law plays a critical role in protecting the environment.

Environmental protection could be enhanced by authorizing innovative advances in environmental regulatory methods.

Arkansas should develop environmental regulatory methods that:

Encourage facility owners and operators to assess the pollution they emit or cause, directly and indirectly, to the air, water, and land;

Encourage facility owners and operators to innovate, set measurable and verifiable goals, and implement the most effective pollution prevention, source reduction, or other pollution reduction strategies for their particular facilities while complying with verifiable and enforceable pollution limits;

Reward facility owners and operators that reduce pollution to levels below those required by applicable law; and

Reduce the time and money spent by agencies and facility owners and operators on paperwork and other administrative tasks that do not benefit the environment.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 500, § 1.

8-11-103. Regulatory flexibility.

The Division of Environmental Quality, by order of the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality consistent with the purposes of this chapter, may approve requests which allow an applicant to use alternative methods to comply with an Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission rule regarding the control or abatement of pollution.

However, the applicant must propose to control or abate pollution by an alternative method, provided the alternative method is:

Quantifiable, measurable, and enforceable;

At least as protective of the environment and the public health as the method prescribed by the requirement or commission rule that would otherwise apply; and

Consistent with federal law.

As a part of the approval process, the director shall provide for public notice and for public participation in considering requests under this section.

The director's order must provide a specific description of the alternative method and must condition any approval on compliance with the method as the order prescribes.

The division may establish a reasonable fee for applications under this section.

A violation of an order issued under this section is punishable as if it were a violation of the previously effective means of compliance.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 500, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3015, 3016.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” twice in (a)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (d).